test/src/morphology/N-causok_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - čâustõk e-stem suopunki: # Noun - full paradigm
     čâustõk+N+Sg+Nom: čâustõk
     čâustõk+N+Sg+Gen: čâustõõǥǥ
     čâustõk+N+Sg+Acc: čâustõõǥǥ
     čâustõk+N+Sg+Ill: čâustõˊǩǩe
     čâustõk+N+Sg+Loc: čâustõõǥǥâst
     čâustõk+N+Sg+Com: čâustõõǥǥin
     čâustõk+N+Ess: čâustõkkân
     čâustõk+N+Par: čâustõkkâd
     čâustõk+N+Sg+Abe: čâustõõǥǥtää
     čâustõk+N+Pl+Nom: čâustõõǥǥ
     čâustõk+N+Pl+Gen: čâustõõǥǥi
     čâustõk+N+Pl+Acc: čâustõõǥǥid
     čâustõk+N+Pl+Ill: čâustõõǥǥid
     čâustõk+N+Pl+Loc: čâustõõǥǥin
     čâustõk+N+Pl+Com: čâustõõǥǥivuiˊm
     čâustõk+N+Pl+Abe: čâustõõǥǥitää
